Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 1
DEFINITION AND APPLICATION

7-80-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Limited Liability Company Act".

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 414, § 1, effective April 18.

7-80-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Articles of organization" means the articles of organization filed in the records of the secretary of state for the purpose of forming a limited liability company as specified in sections 7-80-203 and 7-80-204. "Articles of organization" includes amended articles of organization, restated articles of organization, statements of merger, and other instruments, however designated, on file in the records of the secretary of state that have the effect of amending or supplementing, in some respect, the original or amended articles of organization.

"Bankrupt" means bankrupt or a debtor under the federal bankruptcy code of 1978, title 11 of the United States Code, as amended, or an insolvent under any state insolvency act.

"Business" means any lawful activity, including ownership of real or personal property, whether or not engaged in for profit.

"Contribution" means anything of value that a person contributes to a limited liability company to become a member in the limited liability company or in the capacity of a member in the limited liability company, including cash, property, or services rendered or a promissory note or other binding obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services.

"Court" includes every court and judge having jurisdiction in a case.

and (6.5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2263, § 174, effective July 1, 2004.)

"Limited liability company" or "company" means a limited liability company formed under this article.

(7.5) and (7.6) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2263, § 174, effective July 1, 2004.)

"Manager" means a person designated as a manager of a limited liability company to manage the company pursuant to section 7-80-402.

"Member" means a person with an ownership interest in a limited liability company with the rights and obligations specified under this article. In the case of a limited liability company with only one member, "members" and "all of the members" refers to such one member.

"Membership interest" means a member's share of the profits and losses of a limited liability company and the right to receive distributions of such company's assets.

"Operating agreement" means any agreement of all of the members as to the affairs of a limited liability company and the conduct of its business. Except as otherwise provided in this article or as otherwise required by a written operating agreement, the operating agreement need not be in writing. An operating agreement may contain any provisions required or permitted by section 7-80-108 (1). An operating agreement includes any amendments to the operating agreement.

In the case of a limited liability company with only one member, "operating agreement" includes:

Any writing, without regard to whether such writing otherwise constitutes an agreement, as to such company's affairs and the conduct of the limited liability company's business signed by the sole member;

Any written agreement between the member and the company as to the limited liability company's affairs and the conduct of the limited liability company's business; or

Any agreement, whether or not the agreement is in writing, between the member and the limited liability company as to a limited liability company's affairs and the conduct of its business if the limited liability company is managed by a manager who is a person other than the member.

to (16) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2263, § 174, effective July 1, 2004.)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 414, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

(3), (7), and (11) amended and (6.5), (7.5), (7.6), (14), (15), and (16) added, p. 709, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(7.6), (11), and (13) amended, p. 805, § 21, effective May 24.

L. 97:

(8), (9), and (11) amended and (14.5) added, p. 1502, § 11, effective June 3; (13) amended, p. 917, § 8, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1832, § 70, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1697, § 68, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1), (6) to (7.6), and (12) to (16) amended, p. 2263, § 174, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(11)(a) amended, p. 936, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1), (4), and (8) amended, p. 854, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(4) amended, (HB 16-1329), ch. 242, p. 988, § 1, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this article, see § 7-90-102.

7-80-103. Nature of business.

A limited liability company may be formed under this article for any lawful business, subject to any provisions of law governing or regulating such business within this state.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 415, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 710, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2264, § 175, effective July 1, 2004.

7-80-104. Powers.

Each limited liability company formed and existing under this article may:

Sue and be sued, complain and defend, and participate in administrative or other proceedings, in its name;

Purchase, take, receive, lease or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, use, and otherwise deal in and with real or personal property, or an interest in it, wherever situated;

Sell, convey, assign, encumber, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, transfer, and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property and assets;

Lend money to and otherwise assist its members and employees;

Purchase, take, receive, subscribe for or otherwise acquire, own, hold, vote, use, employ, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, and otherwise use and deal in and with, shares or other interests in or obligations of any other person;

Make contracts and guarantees and incur liabilities, borrow money at such rates of interest as the limited liability company may determine, issue its notes, bonds, and other obligations, and secure any of its obligations by mortgage or pledge of all or any part of its property, franchises, and income;

Lend money for its proper purposes, invest and reinvest its funds, and take and hold real property and personal property for the payment of funds so loaned or invested;

Conduct its business, carry on its operations, and have and exercise the powers granted by this article in any jurisdiction;

Have managers and other agents;

Be a party to the operating agreement;

Indemnify a member or manager or former member or manager of the limited liability company as provided in section

7-80-407

;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2264, § 176, effective July 1, 2004.)

Have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect any or all of the purposes for which the limited liability company is formed;

Be an agent, an associate, a fiduciary, a manager, a member, a partner, a promoter, or a trustee of, or hold any similar position with, any entity, trust, or estate.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 415, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

(1)(d) amended, p. 710, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(e), (1)(h), (1)(j), (1)(l), (1)(m), and (1)(n) amended, p. 2264, § 176, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(k) amended, p. 936, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(i), (1)(j), and (1)(n) amended, p. 854, § 19, effective July 1.

7-80-105. Unauthorized assumption of powers.

All persons who assume to act as a limited liability company without authority to do so and without good-faith belief that they have such authority shall be jointly and severally liable for all debts and liabilities incurred by such persons so acting.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 416, § 1, effective April 18.

7-80-106. Transaction of business outside state.

It is the intention of the general assembly by the enactment of this article that the legal existence of limited liability companies formed under this article be recognized beyond the limits of this state and that, subject to any reasonable registration requirements, any such limited liability company transacting business outside this state be granted the protection of full faith and credit under section 1 of article IV of the constitution of the United States.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 416, § 1, effective April 18.

7-80-107. Application of corporation case law to set aside limited liability.

In any case in which a party seeks to hold the members of a limited liability company personally responsible for the alleged improper actions of the limited liability company, the court shall apply the case law which interprets the conditions and circumstances under which the corporate veil of a corporation may be pierced under Colorado law.

For purposes of this section, the failure of a limited liability company to observe the formalities or requirements relating to the management of its business and affairs is not in itself a ground for imposing personal liability on the members for liabilities of the limited liability company.

A limited liability company's status for federal tax purposes does not affect its status as a distinct entity organized and existing under this article.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 416, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 710, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(3) added, (HB 16-1329), ch. 242, p. 988, § 2, effective August 10.

7-80-108. Effect of operating agreement - nonwaivable provisions - statute of frauds.

The operating agreement may contain any provisions for the affairs of the limited liability company and the conduct of its business to the extent such provisions are consistent with law. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1.5), (2), or (3) of this section, an operating agreement governs the rights, duties, limitations, qualifications, and relations among the managers, the members, the members' assignees and transferees, and the limited liability company. Such provisions shall control over any provision of this article to the contrary except as set forth in subsection (1.5), (2), or (3) of this section. To the extent the operating agreement does not otherwise provide, this article shall control.

A limited liability company is bound by any operating agreement of its members.

An operating agreement may be entered into before, after, or at the time of filing of articles of organization and, whether entered into before, after, or at the time of such filing, may be made effective as of the formation of the limited liability company or as of the time or date provided in the operating agreement.

(1.5) To the extent that a member or manager or other person that is a party to, or is otherwise bound by, the operating agreement has duties, including, but not limited to, fiduciary duties, to a limited liability company or to another member, manager, or other person that is a party to or is otherwise bound by an operating agreement, the duties of such member, manager, or other person may be restricted or eliminated by provisions in the operating agreement, as long as any such provision is not manifestly unreasonable.

An operating agreement may not:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2006, p. 855, § 20, effective July 1, 2006.)

Unreasonably restrict the rights of members and managers under section

7-80-408

;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2006, p. 855, § 20, effective July 1, 2006.)

Eliminate the obligation of good faith and fair dealing under section

7-80-404 (3)

; except that the operating agreement may prescribe the standards by which the performance of the obligation is to be measured, if such standards are not unreasonable;

Eliminate or modify the provisions of section

7-80-801 (1)(c)(I)

, except to extend the time set forth therein to a time not later than the first anniversary of the date of the termination of the membership of the last remaining member; or

Restrict rights of, or impose duties on, persons other than the members, their assignees and transferees, and the limited liability company without the consent of such persons.

(2.5) (a) An operating agreement may contain one or more provisions concerning the enforcement, interpretation, construction, application, severability of provisions, integration, effect of parole evidence, and other matters with respect to the operating agreement or any of its provisions.

Unless otherwise provided in the operating agreement, if any provision of an operating agreement or application thereof to any person or circumstance is unenforceable or otherwise invalid under subsection (1.5) or (2) of this section or otherwise, the provision shall be limited, construed, and applied in a manner that is valid and enforceable, and, in any event, the remaining provisions of the operating agreement shall be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

Unless otherwise provided in the operating agreement with respect to the unenforceability, invalidity, or application of any provision of the operating agreement under subsection (1.5) or (2) of this section, when it is claimed or appears to the court that any provision of the operating agreement may violate subsection (1.5) or (2) of this section, the parties shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to its commercial setting, purpose, and effect, to aid the court in making the determination.

Unless contained in a written operating agreement or other writing approved in accordance with a written operating agreement, no operating agreement may:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 936, § 3, effective July 1, 2004.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 1503, 12, effective June 3, 1997.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 936, § 3, effective July 1, 2004.)

Vary any requirement under this article that a particular action or provision be reflected in a writing.

It is the intent of this article to give the maximum effect to the principle of freedom of contract and to the enforceability of operating agreements.

An operating agreement is not subject to any statute of frauds, including section 38-10-112, C.R.S., regarding void agreements, but not including any requirement under this article that a particular action or provision be reflected in a writing.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 711, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 97:

IP(3) and (3)(b) amended, p. 1503, § 12, effective June 3.

L. 2003:

(2)(d) amended, p. 2265, § 177, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(2) and (3) amended and (4) added, p. 936, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2)(d) amended, p. 1203, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

(1) and (2) amended and (1.5) and (2.5) added, p. 855, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(5) added, (HB 16-1329), ch. 242, p. 988, § 3, effective August 10.

7-80-109. Construction of article.

The rule that statutes in derogation of the common law are to be strictly construed shall have no application to this article.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 938, § 4, effective July 1.